Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.120

Meetings of board—Hearings authorized, notice—Majority to approve release of findings—Administration of oaths.

(1) In the necessary conduct of its work, the board shall meet monthly unless there is no pending business requiring board action and may hold hearings, such hearings to be called by (a) the chair of the board, or (b) a majority of the members of the board. An official notice of the calling of the hearing shall be filed with the secretary, and all members shall be notified of the hearing within a reasonable period of time prior to its convening.

(2) No release of material or statement of findings shall be made except with the approval of a majority of the board.

(3) In the conduct of hearings or investigations, a member of the board or the director, or the hearing officer, may administer oaths.

[ 2012 c 117 s 10; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 406; 1981 c 311 s 17; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 43 s 2; 1961 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.